Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.610

Enterprise services account—Sources—Disbursements.

All moneys, funds, proceeds, and receipts as provided by law shall be paid into the enterprise services account. Disbursements therefrom shall be made in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.19.560 through 43.19.630, * 43.41.130 and * 43.41.140 as authorized by the director or a duly authorized representative and as may be provided by law.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 234; 1998 c 105 s 12; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 35; 1986 c 312 s 902. Prior: 1985 c 405 s 507; 1985 c 57 s 28; 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 12.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.41.130 and 43.41.140 were recodified as RCW 43.19.622 and 43.19.623, respectively, pursuant to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 325.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1998 c 105: See note following RCW 43.19.025.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Severability—1986 c 312: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 312 s 905.]

Severability—1985 c 405: See note following RCW 9.46.100.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 167: See note following RCW 43.19.560.